Utah statutes.
77-36-2.6.   Appearance of defendant required -- Determinations by court.
(1)  A defendant who has been arrested for an offense involving domestic
violence shall appear in person before the court or a magistrate within one
judicial day after the arrest.
(2)  A defendant who has been charged by citation, indictment, or information
with an offense involving domestic violence but has not been arrested, shall
appear before the court in person for arraignment as soon as practicable, but
no later than 14 days after the next day on which court is in session
following the issuance of the citation or the filing of the indictment or
information.
(3)  At the time of an appearance under Subsection (1) or (2), the court shall
determine the necessity of imposing a protective order or other condition of
pretrial release including, but not limited to, participating in an electronic
monitoring program, and shall state its findings and determination in writing.
(4)  Appearances required by this section are mandatory and may not be waived.
